Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.350

Penalty for sewer connection without permission.

It is unlawful and a misdemeanor to make or cause to be made or to maintain any sewer connection with any sewer of any city or town, or with any sewer which is connected directly or indirectly with any sewer of any city or town without having permission from the city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.350. Prior: 1943 c 100 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9354-20.]